Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB824.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3354(d)(2.1) and (f) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3354. Additional parking regulations.* * *(b.1) Protected pedestrian plazas and pedalcycle lanes.--(1) When there is an on-street pedestrian plaza or a pedalcycle lane adjacent to the right-hand curb of a two-way or one-way highway, a vehicle standing or parked upon the right-hand side of the two-way or one-way highway shall be positioned in the direction of authorized traffic movement 12345678910111213141516171819 with the right-hand wheels of the vehicle parallel to and within 12 inches of the outside line of the buffer area between the pedestrian plaza or pedalcycle lane and parking.(2) When there is an on-street pedestrian plaza or a pedalcycle lane adjacent to the left-hand curb of a one-way or median-divided, two-way highway, a vehicle standing or parked upon the left-hand side of the highway shall be positioned in the direction of authorized traffic movement with the left-hand wheels of the vehicle parallel to and within 12 inches of the outside line of the buffer area between the pedestrian plaza or pedalcycle lane and parking.(3) This section does not apply to the stopping or standing of school buses or school vehicles when receiving or discharging school students. A school bus or school vehicle may stop or stand as close as practicable to the curb or shoulder.(4) This section shall not be construed to prevent a local authority from enacting parking regulations under section 6109 (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities) to provide for a special, alternative or temporary configuration and signage for parking on a highway with an on-street pedestrian plaza or pedalcycle lane.* * *(d) Person with a disability and disabled veterans.--* * *(2.1) Local authorities may limit access to a parking space reserved under paragraph (2) to a specific vehicle, license plate or other method of designation. Under this paragraph, local authorities may charge a reasonable fee and shall comply with section 6109 [(relating to specific powers 20250SB0824PN0882 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of department and local authorities)] and the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327).* * *(f) Penalty.--A person violating subsection (a), (b), (b.1) or (d)(1) is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $15. A person violating subsection (d)(2) or (3) or (e) is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $200. If a person is convicted under subsection (d)(2) or (3) in the absence of a sign stating the penalty amount, the fine imposed may not exceed $50. A person violating subsection (d.1) is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $300.* * *Section 2. Section 3505 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3505. Riding on roadways and pedalcycle paths.* * *(f.1) Mandatory use of available pedalcycle path.--Whenever a lane or path for pedalcycles has been provided as a part of a highway and mandatory use of the lane or path has been indicated by official traffic control devices, pedalcycle riders shall use the lane or path and shall not use any other part of the highway. This subsection does not apply when use of the pedalcycle lane or path is not possible, safe or reasonable.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0824PN0882 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627